New York, session 2025-2026, S8906.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 396-xx to read as follows: 3 § 396-xx. Retail gas station; direct current fast chargers. 1. As used 4 in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 (a) "Retail gas station" shall mean a filling station where such fuel 6 is stored primarily for sale by delivery directly into the ordinary fuel 7 tank connected with the engine of a motor vehicle to be consumed in the 8 operation of such motor vehicle or where such fuel is stored primarily 9 for sale by delivery directly into the ordinary fuel tank connected with 10 the engine of a vessel to be consumed in the operation of such vessel. 11 (b) "Dealer" shall mean any person owning or operating a retail gas 12 station. 13 (c) "Charging station" shall mean the area in the immediate vicinity 14 of a group of chargers and includes the chargers, supporting equipment, 15 parking areas adjacent to the chargers, and lanes for vehicle ingress 16 and egress. 17 (d) "Direct current fast charger" shall mean a charger that enables 18 rapid charging by delivering direct-current electricity directly to an 19 electric vehicle's battery. 20 (e) "Electric vehicle" shall mean a motor vehicle, as defined by 21 section one hundred twenty-five of the vehicle and traffic law, which is 22 propelled by one or more electric motors using electric energy stored in 23 batteries or other energy storage devices. 24 2. (a) No building permit shall be issued to a dealer if the documen- 25 tation submitted for such building permit does not reflect the installa- 26 tion of at least one electric vehicle charging station using direct 27 current fast chargers at such retail gas station per four gas dispensing EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14257-02-6 S. 8906 2 1 pumps, provided, however, that retail gas stations with fewer than four 2 gas dispensing pumps shall be exempt from the provisions of this 3 section. 4 (b) No retail gas station shall open for business prior to completing 5 construction and installation of all charging stations required pursuant 6 to paragraph (a) of this subdivision. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 8 law.